District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.07

Applicability.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to actions taken after July 13, 1998.

(b)

This subchapter shall apply to employees of the WMATA when the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland enact similar provisions for WMATA whistleblowers.

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 208, 45 DCR 5147
1981 Ed., § 1-1177.7.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.